test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vakja: # 
    vakja+V+Inf: vakja
    vakja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vakir
    vakja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: vakti
    vakja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vaktu
    vakja+V+Sup: vakt

  Verb - roykja: # 
    roykja+V+Inf: roykja
    roykja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: roykir
    roykja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: roykti
    roykja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: royktu
    roykja+V+Sup: roykt
    roykja+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: royktur
